Idaho statutes. Title 14 ESTATES OF DECEDENTS
Chapter 5 UNCLAIMED PROPERTY LAW
§ 14-522. Public sale of abandoned property.

The administrator may, within three (3) years after the receipt of abandoned property, sell it to the highest bidder at public sale in whatever city affords, in the judgment of the administrator, the most favorable market for the property involved. The administrator may decline the highest bid and reoffer the property for sale if in the judgment of the administrator, the bid is insufficient. If in the judgment of the administrator, the probable cost of sale exceeds the value of the property, it need not be offered for sale. Any sale held under this section must be preceded by a single publication of notice, at least three (3) weeks in advance of sale, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the property is to be sold.

Securities listed on an established stock exchange must be sold at prices prevailing at the time of sale on the exchange. Other securities may be sold over the counter at prices prevailing at the time of sale or by any other method the administrator considers advisable.

A person making a claim under this chapter is entitled to receive either the securities delivered to the administrator by the holder, if they still remain in the hands of the administrator, or the proceeds received from the sale, less any amounts deducted pursuant to section 14-523(4), Idaho Code, but no person has any claim under this chapter against the state, the holder, any transfer agent, registrar, or other person acting for or on behalf of a holder for any appreciation in the value of the property occurring after delivery by the holder to the administrator.

The purchaser of property at any sale conducted by the administrator pursuant to this chapter takes the property free of all claims of the owner or previous holder thereof and of all persons claiming through or under them. The administrator shall execute all documents necessary to complete the transfer of ownership.

§ 14-523. Disposition of money received.

All money received under this chapter, including the proceeds from the sale of property under section 14-522, Idaho Code, shall be deposited in the unclaimed property account.

Moneys in the unclaimed property account are subject to redemption by the owner as follows:

All moneys designated by law for escheatment to the public school permanent endowment fund created pursuant to section 4, article IX, of the constitution of the state of Idaho may be redeemed by the owner, upon satisfaction of the requirements for redemption established in rule by the administrator, if claimed within a period of ten (10) years from the date the property is subject to the custody of the state under this chapter. Upon the conclusion of such redemption period, unredeemed moneys shall escheat to the public school permanent endowment fund.

Moneys submitted from unnamed owners may be designated as unredeemable after a period of ten (10) years upon satisfaction of the requirements for designation as unredeemable established in rule by the administrator.

All other moneys in the unclaimed property account may be redeemed by the owner upon satisfaction of the requirements for redemption established in rule by the administrator.

Moneys in the unclaimed property account shall be distributed as follows:

All moneys designated by law for distribution to the public school permanent endowment fund shall be transferred from the unclaimed property account to the public school permanent endowment fund upon the expiration of the period provided in this section for the owner to redeem such moneys.

The state treasurer shall transfer all moneys designated as unredeemable to the general fund at the end of each fiscal year.

All money in the unclaimed property account is hereby continuously appropriated to the state treasurer, without regard to fiscal years, for expenditure in accordance with law in carrying out and enforcing the provisions of this chapter, including, but not limited to, the following purposes:

For payment of claims allowed by the state treasurer under the provisions of this chapter.

For refund, to the person making such deposit of amounts, including overpayments, deposited in error in such account.

For payment of the cost of appraisals incurred by the state treasurer covering property held in the name of the account.

For payment of the cost incurred by the state treasurer for the purchase of lost instrument indemnity bonds, or for payment to the person entitled thereto, for any unpaid lawful charges or costs which arose from holding any specific property or any specific funds which were delivered or paid to the state treasurer, or which arose from complying with this chapter with respect to such property or funds.

For payment of amounts required to be paid by the state as trustee, bailee, or successor in interest to the preceding owner.

For payment of costs of official advertising in connection with the sale of property held in the name of the account.

For transfer to the general fund as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

For transfer to the public school permanent endowment fund as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

At the end of each fiscal year, or more often, if he or she deems it advisable, the state treasurer shall transfer all money in the unclaimed property account in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) to the general fund. Within sixty (60) days of making this transfer or of receiving a report of unclaimed property, whichever is earlier, the administrator shall record the name and last known address, if available, of each person identified as the apparent owner of the unclaimed property in the unclaimed property account or transferred to the general fund. The record shall be available for public review on the state treasurer’s website.

§ 14-524. Filing of claim with administrator.

A person, excluding another state, claiming an interest in any property paid or delivered to the administrator, may file a claim on a form prescribed by the administrator and verified by the claimant.

The administrator shall consider each claim within ninety (90) days after it is filed and give written notice to the claimant if the claim is denied in whole or in part. The ninety (90) day time period may be extended by the claimant and the administrator upon their written agreement. The notice may be given by mailing it to the last address, if any, stated in the claim as the address to which notices are to be sent. If no address for notices is stated in the claim, the notice may be mailed to the last address, if any, of the claimant as stated in the claim. No notice of denial need be given if the claim fails to state either the last address to which notices are to be sent or the address of the claimant.

If a claim is allowed:

Except upon election of donation as authorized in subsection (3)(c) of this section, the administrator shall pay over or deliver to the claimant the property or the amount the administrator actually received or the net proceeds, if it has been sold by the administrator, together with any additional amount required by section 14-521, Idaho Code.

If the property claimed was interest-bearing to the owner on the date of surrender by the holder, the administrator also shall pay interest at a rate of five percent (5%) a year or any lesser rate the property earned while in the possession of the holder. Interest begins to accrue when the property is delivered to the administrator and ceases on the earlier of the expiration of ten (10) years after delivery or the date on which payment is made to the owner.

As directed by the claimant, the administrator shall pay over or deliver any property, proceeds, interest and other sums payable pursuant to this chapter to one (1) or more of the following: the general fund of the state of Idaho defined in section 67-1205, Idaho Code; the public school permanent endowment fund created pursuant to section 4, article IX, of the constitution of the state of Idaho; the veterans cemetery maintenance fund created pursuant to section 65-107, Idaho Code; or the park and recreation capital improvement account created pursuant to section 57-1801, Idaho Code.

Any holder who pays the owner for property that has been delivered to the state and which, if claimed from the administrator, would be subject to the provisions of subsection (3)(b) of this section, shall add interest as provided in subsection (3)(b). The added interest must be repaid to the holder by the administrator in the same manner as the principal.

A person claiming an abandoned utility deposit under section 14-508(1), Idaho Code, who is entitled thereto under this section, which was not deposited with the administrator under section 14-508(2), Idaho Code, may file a claim on a form prescribed by the administrator and verified by the claimant. The administrator will forward the claim to the utility company, who shall remit such payment to the claimant upon receipt of the claim.

§ 14-525. Claim of another state to recover property — Procedure.

At any time after property has been paid or delivered to the administrator under this chapter, another state may recover the property if:

The property was subjected to custody by this state because the records of the holder did not reflect the last known address of the apparent owner when the property was presumed abandoned under this chapter, and the other state establishes that the last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property was in that state and, under the laws of that state, the property escheated to or was subject to a claim of abandonment by that state;

The last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property, as reflected by the records of the holder, is in the other state and under the laws of that state the property has escheated to or become subject to a claim of abandonment by that state;

The records of the holder were erroneous in that they did not accurately reflect the actual owner of the property and the last known address of the actual owner is in the other state and under the laws of that state the property escheated to or was subject to a claim of abandonment by that state;

The property was subjected to custody by this state under section 14-503(3)(b), Idaho Code, and under the laws of the state of domicile of the holder the property has escheated to or become subject to a claim of abandonment by that state; or

The property is the sum payable on a travelers check, money order, or other similar instrument that was subjected to custody by this state under section 14-504, Idaho Code, and the instrument was purchased in the other state, and under the laws of that state the property escheated to or became subject to a claim of abandonment by that state.

The claim of another state to recover escheated or abandoned property must be presented in a form prescribed by the administrator, who shall decide the claim within ninety (90) days after it is presented. The administrator shall allow the claim if he determines that the other state is entitled to the abandoned property under subsection (1) of this section.

The administrator shall require a state, before recovering property under this section, to agree to indemnify this state and its officers and employees against any liability on a claim for the property.

§ 14-526. Action to establish claim.

A person aggrieved by a denial of a claim by the administrator or whose claim has not been acted upon within the time provided in subsection (2) of section 14-524, Idaho Code, may obtain a redetermination as provided in section 63-3045, Idaho Code, by filing a written protest with the administrator within sixty-three (63) days after the denial was mailed or after the time period for issuing the denial has lapsed. Judicial review of any redetermination shall be as provided in section 63-3049, Idaho Code.

§ 14-527. Election to take payment or delivery.

The administrator may decline to receive any property reported under the provisions of this chapter which it considers to have a value less than the expense of giving notice and of sale. If the administrator elects not to receive custody of the property, the holder shall be notified within one hundred twenty (120) days after filing the report required under section 14-517, Idaho Code.

A holder, with the written consent of the administrator and upon conditions and terms prescribed by him, may report and deliver property before the property is presumed abandoned. Property delivered under this subsection must be held by the administrator and is not presumed abandoned until such time as it otherwise would be presumed abandoned under this chapter.

§ 14-528. Destruction or disposition of property having insubstantial commercial value — Immunity from liability.

If the administrator determines after investigation that any delivered property has insubstantial commercial value, the administrator may destroy or otherwise dispose of the property at any time. No action or proceeding may be maintained against the state or any officer or against the holder for or on account of any action taken by the administrator pursuant to this section.

§ 14-529. Periods of limitation.

The expiration, before or after the effective date of this act, of any period of time specified by contract, statute, or court order, during which a claim for money or property can be made or during which an action or proceeding may be commenced or enforced to obtain payment of a claim for money or to recover property, does not prevent the money or property from being presumed abandoned or affect any duty to file a report or to pay or deliver abandoned property to the administrator as required in this chapter except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

Where a holder has filed a report as required by section 14-517, Idaho Code, the administrator may commence any action or proceeding with respect to any duty of a holder to report and deliver unclaimed property under this act within three (3) years after the time for the filing of a report concerning the property as required by section 14-517, Idaho Code.

Where a holder violates section 14-517, Idaho Code, by failing to file a report, the administrator may commence any action or proceeding with respect to any duty of a holder to report and deliver unclaimed property under this act within seven (7) years after the time for the filing of a report concerning the property as required by section 14-517, Idaho Code.

§ 14-530. Requests for reports and examination of records.

The administrator may require any person who has not filed a report to file a verified report stating whether or not the person is holding any unclaimed property reportable or deliverable under this chapter.

The administrator, at reasonable times and upon reasonable notice, may examine the records of any person to determine whether the person has complied with the provisions of this chapter. The administrator may conduct the examination even if the person believes it is not in possession of any property reportable or deliverable under the provisions of this chapter.

If a person is treated under section 14-512, Idaho Code, as the holder of the property only insofar as the interest of the business association in the property is concerned, the administrator, pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, may examine the records of the person if the administrator has given the notice required by subsection (2) to both the person and the business association at least ninety (90) days before the examination.

If a holder fails to maintain the records required by section 14-531, Idaho Code, and the records of the holder available for the periods subject to this chapter and [are] insufficient to permit the preparation of a report, the administrator may require the holder to report and pay such amounts as may reasonably be estimated from any available records.

§ 14-531. Retention of records.

Every holder of unclaimed property under this chapter as to any property for which it has obtained the last known address of the owner, shall maintain a record of the name and last known address of the owner for seven (7) years after the year in which the property becomes unclaimed, except to the extent that a shorter time as [is] provided in subsection (2) of this section or by rule of the administrator.

Any business association that sells in this state its travelers checks, money orders, or other similar written instruments, other than third-party bank checks on which the business association is directly liable, or that provides such instruments to others for sale in this state, shall maintain a record of those instruments while they remain outstanding, indicating the state and date of issue for three (3) years after the year in which the property becomes unclaimed.

§ 14-532. Enforcement — Actions to enforce unclaimed property law — Administrative rules.

The collection and enforcement procedures provided by the Idaho income tax act, sections 63-3038, 63-3039, and 63-3042 through 63-3065A, Idaho Code, but excluding section 63-3045(7), Idaho Code, shall apply and be available to the state treasurer for enforcement of the provisions of this chapter and collection of any property required to be transferred shall be treated in the same manner as taxes due the state of Idaho, and wherever liens or any other proceedings are defined as income tax liens or proceedings, they shall, when applied in enforcement of this chapter, be described as unclaimed property liens and proceedings.

The powers and duties held by the state tax commission on June 30, 2010, pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, shall for the purposes of this chapter and for the administration of the unclaimed property be deemed to be powers and duties of the state treasurer on and after July 1, 2010.

The administrative rules of the state tax commission in effect on June 30, 2010, for administering the provisions of this chapter shall remain in force and effect as if promulgated by the state treasurer until new rules are promulgated by the state treasurer and become effective pursuant to the provisions of section 67-5224, Idaho Code, at which time rules promulgated by the state tax commission shall be deemed repealed. The state treasurer shall have the power to promulgate administrative rules to implement the provisions of this chapter in compliance with chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

§ 14-533. Interest and penalties.

Upon the administrator’s showing by a preponderance of evidence that a holder has failed to pay or deliver property within the time prescribed in this chapter, the holder shall pay to the administrator interest at the annual rate of twelve percent (12%) on the property or value thereof from the date the property should have been paid or delivered until actual delivery is made.

Upon the administrator’s showing by a preponderance of evidence that a holder has negligently failed to pay or deliver property within the time prescribed in this chapter, the holder shall pay to the administrator a penalty at the annual rate of five percent (5%) on the property or value thereof from the date the property should have been paid or delivered until actual delivery is made unless the holder demonstrates to the satisfaction of the administrator that the failure was due to reasonable cause and not neglect.

A holder who willfully refuses after written demand by the administrator to pay or deliver property as required under this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction may be punished by a fine of not less than three hundred dollars ($300) nor more than three thousand dollars ($3,000).

Upon a showing that a holder of property presumed to be abandoned or unclaimed has acted in good faith and without negligence to comply with the accurate reporting requirements of section 14-517, Idaho Code, the administrator may waive, in whole or in part, interest pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and penalties pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

§ 14-534. State historical society use of property.

The director of the state historical society may examine any tangible personal property delivered to the state treasurer under this chapter for purposes of determining whether such property is of sufficient historical value that it should be preserved. If he so determines, the state treasurer may deliver such property to the state historical society for preservation and display, until such time as the owner shall make claim for return of such property.

§ 14-535. Interstate agreements and cooperation — Joint and reciprocal actions with other states.

The administrator may enter into agreements with other states to exchange information needed to enable this or another state to audit or otherwise determine unclaimed property that it or another state may be entitled to subject to a claim of custody. The administrator by rule may require the reporting of information needed to enable compliance with agreements made pursuant to this section and prescribe the form for reporting.

To avoid conflicts between the administrator’s procedures and the procedures of administrators in other jurisdictions that enact the uniform unclaimed property act, the administrator, so far as is consistent with the purposes, policies, and provisions of this chapter, before adopting, amending or repealing rules, shall advise and consult with administrators in other jurisdictions that enact substantially the uniform unclaimed property act and take into consideration the rules of administrators in other jurisdictions that enact the uniform unclaimed property act.

The administrator may join with other states to seek enforcement of this act against any person who is or may be holding reportable property.

At the request of another state, the attorney general of this state may bring an action in the name of the administrator of the other state in any court of competent jurisdiction to enforce the unclaimed property laws of the other state against a holder in this state of property subject to escheat or a claim of abandonment by the other state, if the other state has agreed to pay expenses incurred by the attorney general in bringing the action.

The administrator may request that the attorney general of another state or any other person bring an action in the name of the administrator in the other state. This state shall pay all expenses including attorney’s fees in any action under this subsection. The administrator may agree to pay the person bringing the action attorney’s fees based in whole or in part on a percentage of the value of any property recovered in the action. Any expenses paid pursuant to this subsection may not be deducted from the amount that is subject to the claim by the owner under this chapter.

§ 14-536. Agreement to locate reported property.

All agreements to pay compensation to recover or assist in the recovery of property reported under section 14-517, Idaho Code, made within twenty-four (24) months after the date payment or delivery is made under section 14-519, Idaho Code, are unenforceable.

§ 14-537. Foreign transactions.

This chapter does not apply to any property held, due and owing in a foreign country and arising out of a foreign transaction.

§ 14-538. Effect of new provisions

Clarification of application. [Repealed.]

§ 14-539. Rules.

The administrator may adopt necessary rules to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

§ 14-540. Uniformity of application and construction.

This act shall be applied and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this act among states enacting it.

§ 14-541. Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Unclaimed Property Act.”

§ 14-542. Exemption.

The following shall be eligible for a certificate of exemption from the administrator. Entities holding a certificate of exemption shall not be subject to the provisions of this chapter, except as set forth in this section:

Idaho counties; and

Solely for the purpose of unclaimed capital credits, nonprofit corporations engaged in providing telecommunications or broadband service or delivery of electric power. For the purposes of this section, a capital credit is an amount paid by a member for telecommunication, broadband, or electric service in excess of the costs and expenses incurred by a nonprofit corporation in furnishing the service that is credited to the member’s capital account by the nonprofit corporation and distributed to the member.

A certificate of exemption shall be provided to an eligible entity on the following basis:

The county commissioners or board of directors, as applicable, file an election in writing with the administrator;

The entity establishes a revolving fund to pay claimants, and retains in said fund, an amount equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the accumulated unclaimed property or twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), whichever is less. Excess money in the revolving fund may be transferred to any fund of the entity; provided however, that a transfer of funds shall not alter or extinguish an owner’s right to claim the property; and

The entity provides the administrator with the information required in the reports of abandoned property to enable the administrator to maintain a complete central registry of all unclaimed property in the state.

In the event of revocation of the election, or the administrator determines that the entity has not complied with the requirements or exemption, the exemption shall terminate, the entity shall transfer all unclaimed property and unclaimed property records to the administrator and the entity shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter.

In the alternative to subsections (1) through (3) of this section, a nonprofit corporation identified in subsection (1)(b) of this section may elect to be exempt from the provisions of this chapter that otherwise require it to report capital credits unclaimed by members. The nonprofit corporation may do so by filing with the administrator a certification of the secretary of the nonprofit corporation stating that the bylaws or policies adopted by the members or the board of the nonprofit corporation specify the procedures the nonprofit corporation uses to determine when capital credits shall be determined to be unclaimed and the procedures that will be used to attempt to locate and return such unclaimed credits to members. At the nonprofit corporation’s election, such procedures may include publication by the administrator pursuant to section 14-518, Idaho Code. If the owner of the unclaimed capital credit has not been located and the funds have not been returned within four (4) years after they have been determined to be unclaimed, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the nonprofit corporation may use the funds for the benefit of the general membership of the nonprofit corporation or for the communities it serves, as determined by its board of directors.

§ 14-543. Successors’ liability.

If any holder possessing unclaimed property under this act sells out its business or stock of goods, the purchaser of the business or stock of goods shall make inquiry of the administrator and withhold from the purchase price any amount of unclaimed property that may be due under this chapter until such time as the administrator provides written notification stating that no amount is due.

If the purchaser of a business or stock of goods fails to withhold the amounts required by subsection (1) of this section from the purchase price, he becomes personally liable for the payment of the amount required to be withheld to the extent of the purchase price valued in money.

The administrator shall, as soon as practicable after receiving written inquiry as to any amounts due, and no later than thirty (30) days after receipt of the inquiry or, if necessary, thirty (30) days from the date the holder’s records are made available for review under section 14-530, Idaho Code, but in any event no later than sixty (60) days after receiving the inquiry, issue a statement to the purchaser setting forth the amount due under this chapter by the holder, if any. The administrator’s failure to issue such statement will release the purchaser from any obligation to withhold from the purchase price the amounts as above required, or responsibility for the reporting or delivery of any unclaimed property due and owing by the holder under section 14-517, Idaho Code, and section 14-519, Idaho Code.